West Virginia, session 2026, HB4173.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS. §3-1-2b. Candidates must reside in the district they seek to represent. A candidate for election for any state, county, or local office is required to have his or her principal residence within the election district for the office for which they are seeking to be elected. For the purpose of this section, "principal residence" means the residence where the candidate is domiciled which includes both physical residency and an intent to remain in the state, district, county, or municipality. Facts that may demonstrate the domicile or principal residence of a person in the state, county, or municipality include, but are not limited to, the physical character of the person's residence(s); the person's time spent in the residence; the person's reasons for residency; whether the person intends on returning permanently to another residence outside of the state, district, county, or municipality in the future; whether the person obtains a license to operate a vehicle in the state; whether the person registers a vehicle(s) or other property at that address; the address listed on the person's vehicle registration card; the address listed on the person's voter registration card; the address listed on the person's driver's license; the address where the person receives state or federal benefits; and, where the person pays property or income taxes. The provisions of this section shall not apply to candidates for Circuit Court Judge, Family Court Judge, or Prosecuting Attorney.